Utah statutes.
17-19-3.   Payments -- Notification.

(1) (a)  Subject to Subsection (1)(b), each claim incurred by the county and legally examined and allowed and ordered paid by the county executive shall, if approved by the county auditor as to the availability of funds as provided in Section 17-19-1, be paid by:

(i)  a warrant drawn by the auditor on the county treasurer in favor of the person entitled to payment; or

(ii)  a county check or such other payment mechanism as may be adopted pursuant to Chapter 36, Uniform Fiscal Procedures Act for Counties.

(b)  No claim may be paid until:

(i)  the auditor:

(A)  receives from the county executive the certified list mentioned in Subsection 17-20-1.7(4); and

(B)  makes a recommendation regarding payment as provided in Section 17-50-401 or Section 17-50-401.1, as applicable; and

(ii)  the county executive approves payment of the claim in accordance with the standards and procedures of Section 17-50-401 or Section 17-50-401.1, as applicable.

(2)  Each debt and demand against the county, when the amount is fixed by law and not directed to be audited by some other person or tribunal, shall be paid by either:

(a)  a warrant drawn by the auditor on the county treasurer; or

(b)  a check or such other payment mechanism as may be adopted pursuant to Chapter 36, Uniform Fiscal Procedures Act for Counties.

(3) (a)  The auditor shall distinctly specify on each warrant the liability for which it is made and when the liability accrued.  The auditor shall also notify the treasurer of the date, amount, and payee of and number assigned to each warrant issued and the aggregate amount of all contemporaneous payments by warrant.

(b)  The auditor shall notify the treasurer and the county executive of the amount and payee of all payments to be made by check or other payment mechanism and, if the auditor issues the check or other payment mechanism, the date of and number assigned to each check or other payment mechanism and the aggregate amount of all such contemporaneous payments.

